src-fst-morphology-affixes-adjectives.lexc.md
* **LEXICON AGAdj**  mostly words like guovttejagat, allajoccat etc

* **LEXICON AGAdjINFL**

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-sme/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc)</small>
